District of Columbia statutes.
9-913

Marketability of bonds.

The Authority may exercise all or any party or combination of the powers granted by this chapter, including the power: To make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized, of like, or different character; to make covenants and to do all acts as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure its bonds or, in the absolute discretion of the Authority, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants or acts may not be enumerated in this chapter.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 14, 32 DCR 6093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1263.